Nebraska, session 109, LB1042.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1042 LB1042
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 44-6410, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-6410 (1) Regardless of the number of vehicles involved, persons
covered, claims made, vehicles or premiums shown on the policy, or
premiums paid, the limits of liability for uninsured or underinsured
motorist coverage for two or more motor vehicles insured under the same
policy or separate policies held by the same person or by related persons
residing in the same household shall not be added together, combined, or
stacked to determine the limit of insurance coverage available to an
injured person for any one accident except as provided in section
44-6411.
(2) Regardless of the insurance policy language, the limits of
liability for uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage for two or more
motor vehicles insured under separate policies held by different
policyholders who are not related persons residing in the same household
may be added together, combined, or stacked to determine the limit of
insurance coverage available to an injured person for any one accident.
Sec. 2. Section 44-6411, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-6411 (1) In the event an insured is entitled to uninsured or
underinsured motorist coverage under more than one policy of motor
vehicle liability insurance held by the same person or by related persons
residing in the same household, the maximum amount an insured may recover
shall not exceed the highest limit of any one such policy.
(2) In the event of bodily injury, sickness, disease, or death of an
insured while occupying a motor vehicle not owned by the insured, payment
shall be made in the following order of priority, subject to the
limitations in subsection (1) of this section, if applicable: (a) The
uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage on the occupied motor vehicle
is primary; and (b) if such primary coverage is exhausted, other
uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage available to the insured is
-2-

LB1042 LB1042
2026 2026
excess.
(3) In the event an injured person is entitled to coverage under
more than one policy When multiple policies apply, payment shall be made
in the following order of priority, subject to the limit of liability for
each applicable policy:
(a) A policy covering a motor vehicle occupied by the injured person
at the time of the accident;
(b) A policy covering a motor vehicle which causes bodily injury,
sickness, disease, or death of the insured while a pedestrian; and
(c) A policy covering a motor vehicle not involved in the accident
with respect to which the injured person is an insured.
Sec. 3. Original sections 44-6410 and 44-6411, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-3-